Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2548.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 5368HV (1) 91 ss/ns H.F. 2548 Section 1. Section 11.6, subsection 11, paragraph a, Code 1 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2 a. The auditor of state shall adopt rules in accordance with 3 chapter 17A to establish and collect a periodic examination fee 4 from cities that are not required to have an audit or required 5 fiscal year examination conducted pursuant to subsection 1 6 during a fiscal year. Such fees are due on March 31 each year. 7 The auditor of state shall base the periodic examination fees 8 the auditor of state establishes shall be on a sliding scale , 9 based on the cityâs budgeted gross expenditures, to produce 10 total revenue of not more than three six hundred seventy-five 11 thousand dollars for each fiscal year. However, cities that 12 pay a filing fee for an audit or examination pursuant to 13 subsection 10 during the fiscal year are not required to pay 14 the periodic examination fee. The funds collected shall be 15 maintained in a segregated account for use by the office of the 16 auditor of state in performing periodic examinations conducted 17 pursuant to subsection 1 . However, if the fees collected in 18 one fiscal year exceed three six hundred seventy-five thousand 19 dollars, the auditor of state shall apply the excess funds 20 to provide training to city officials on municipal financial 21 management or shall contract with a qualified organization 22 to provide such training. Notwithstanding section 8.33 , any 23 fees collected by the auditor of state for these purposes that 24 remain unexpended at the end of the fiscal year shall not 25 revert to the general fund of the state or any other fund but 26 shall remain available for use for the following fiscal year 27 for the purposes authorized in this subsection . 28 Sec. 2. APPLICABILITY. This Act applies to fees collected 29 in fiscal years beginning on or after July 1, 2026. 30